New Jersey, session 222, S1959.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an unemployed individual who is otherwise eligible shall not be deemed ineligible to receive unemployment benefits because the individual was terminated or voluntarily left employment as a result of non-compliance with Executive Order 283 of 2022. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply retroactively to any claims after January 19, 2022.  This act shall expire on the 365th day next following enactment.